local/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
    <pardef n="bal__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ars</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ansjovis__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ars</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alm__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ars</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="procent__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="adress__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accent__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="adress"><i>adress</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ananas"><i>ananas</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anarkist"><i>anarkist</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aprikos"><i>aprikos</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atlas"><i>atlas</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="attack"><i>attack</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bal"><i>bal</i><par n="bal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balsam"><i>balsam</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bank"><i>bank</i><par n="bal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="befolkning"><i>befolkning</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bit"><i>bit</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blockad"><i>blockad</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blus"><i>blus</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="broms"><i>broms</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brunn"><i>brunn</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cirkus"><i>cirkus</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="citron"><i>citron</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cypress"><i>cypress</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dansk"><i>dansk</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diagnos"><i>diagnos</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="distans"><i>distans</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eftermiddag"><i>eftermiddag</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fakultet"><i>fakultet</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filt"><i>filt</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fredag"><i>fredag</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gas"><i>gas</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="giraff"><i>giraff</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glass"><i>glass</i><par n="bal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guldfisk"><i>guldfisk</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hals"><i>hals</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hingst"><i>hingst</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hiss"><i>hiss</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="is"><i>is</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="journal"><i>journal</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaktus"><i>kaktus</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kalv"><i>kalv</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kines"><i>kines</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klass"><i>klass</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kompass"><i>kompass</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kompensation"><i>kompensation</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kompis"><i>kompis</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kompress"><i>kompress</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="korg"><i>korg</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kultur"><i>kultur</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lapp"><i>lapp</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lax"><i>lax</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leverans"><i>leverans</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="madrass"><i>madrass</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mast"><i>mast</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motsats"><i>motsats</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="novell"><i>novell</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="period"><i>period</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plog"><i>plog</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="portugis"><i>portugis</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potatis"><i>potatis</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prins"><i>prins</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="procent"><i>procent</i><par n="procent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="produkt"><i>produkt</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puss"><i>puss</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pyjamas"><i>pyjamas</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rubin"><i>rubin</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ryss"><i>ryss</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sanning"><i>sanning</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sax"><i>sax</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="signal"><i>signal</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skymning"><i>skymning</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sparris"><i>sparris</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spis"><i>spis</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sport"><i>sport</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stol"><i>stol</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svans"><i>svans</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tarm"><i>tarm</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tass"><i>tass</i><par n="ansjovis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="term"><i>term</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terrass"><i>terrass</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
    <e lm="torsk"><i>torsk</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uniform"><i>uniform</i><par n="accent__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vik"><i>vik</i><par n="alm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polis"><i>polis</i><par n="adress__n"/></e>
